District of Columbia statutes.
1-1317

Order of survey to be speedily executed.

The Surveyor shall, as speedily as possible, execute any order of survey made by any court or private individual of any lot or square within the City of Washington, or of any land within the District of Columbia outside of said City, and shall make due return of a true plat and certificate thereof.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1426, ch. 854, § 1590
1981 Ed., § 1-917.
1973 Ed., § 1-617.